Tennessee, session 114, SB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-402(12)(B)(ii), is amended by
deleting ". This subdivision (12)(B)(ii) is repealed on July 1, 2025".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1290
000181
- 1 -